Mississippi, session 2026, SB2356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 83-41-218, Mississippi Code of 1972: 83-41-218.  For a policy of insurance or any medical service plan or hospital service contract or hospital and medical service contract issued in this state, an insurer or third-party administrator for an insurer must provide reimbursement to a pharmacist for a service or procedure at a rate not less than that provided to any other nonphysician health care provider if the service or procedure is all of the following: (a)  Within the scope of practice of a pharmacist, as defined in Section 73-21-73; and (b)  Would otherwise be covered under the policy, plan or contract if the service or procedure is provided by any health care service provider or other person. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.